Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.520

Required submission of capital expenditure projects.

At least five months before the end of each fiscal year each county officer, department, board or commission and each governmental body whose jurisdiction lies entirely within the county, except incorporated cities and towns, whose functions include preparing and recommending plans for, or constructing major public works, shall submit to the respective planning agency a list of the proposed public works being recommended for initiation or construction during the ensuing fiscal year.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.520. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 52.]